Wisconsin, session 2025, SB294.
do enact as follows:SB294,13Section 1. 94.51 of the statutes is created to read:SB294,1,4494.51 Pollinator labeling. (1) In this section:SB294,1,65(a) “Plant” means an annual plant, bedding plant, or other plant and includes 6plant material and nursery stock, as defined under s. 94.10 (1) (f).SB294,2,11(b) “Pollinator” means an insect that pollinates flowers.SB294,2,32(c) “Systemic insecticide” means an insecticide that is absorbed by a plant and 3moves through the plant’s vascular system.SB294,2,84(2) No person that sells a plant at retail or provides a plant to an end user may 5label or advertise the plant as being beneficial to pollinators if the plant has been 6treated with a systemic insecticide that has a pollinator protection box on its label 7or that has a pollinator, bee, or honeybee precautionary statement in the 8environmental hazards section of its label.SB294,29Section 2. Effective date.SB294,2,1110(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 11publication.SB294,2,1212